Utah statutes.
40-6-16.   Duties of division.
In addition to the duties assigned by the board, the division shall:
(1)  develop and implement an inspection program that will include but not be
limited to production data, pre-drilling checks, and site security reviews;
(2)  publish a monthly production report;
(3)  publish a monthly gas processing plant report;
(4)  review and evaluate, prior to a hearing, evidence submitted with the
petition to be presented to the board;
(5)  require adequate assurance of approved water rights in accordance with
rules and orders enacted under Section 40-6-5; and
(6)  notify the county executive of the county in which the drilling will take
place in writing of the issuance of a drilling permit.
